Connecticut, session 2026, SB00518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17 of public act 05-279, as amended by special act
24-11, is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Whereas the parcel of land described in subsection (a) of section 2
of special act 95-25, having an area of approximately ten acres and sold
to the Shiloh Baptist Community Development Corporation in a deed
recorded on the city of Middletown Land Records in Volume 1278 at
Page 942, has reverted to the state of Connecticut, notwithstanding any
provision of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Administrative
Services shall convey said parcel of land to the Shiloh Baptist
Community Development Corporation, at a cost equal to the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. The conveyance shall
be subject to the approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) Not later than June 30, 2029, the Shiloh Baptist Community
Development Corporation shall use the parcel for moderate-income
housing and recreational or community facilities open to the public. Such
housing and facilities shall comply with all nondiscrimination
requirements concerning the occupancy of housing or the use of facilities,

Substitute Senate Bill No. 518
which are developed in whole or in part with federal assistance, and said
parcel of land and such housing and facilities shall not be used for the
teaching or practicing of religion. If (1) construction is not commenced on
said parcel of land [is not used] or a loan signed to be used for financing
such construction for the development of such housing and facilities by
June 30, 2029, or (2) such housing or facilities do not comply with such
requirements at any time after the conveyance of the parcel occurring on
or after July 1, 2024, the parcel of land shall revert to the state of
Connecticut. The reverter provisions of this subsection in effect on and
after July 1, 2024, shall replace and extinguish any prior reverter
provisions recorded on the city of Middletown Land Records, including
in the deed recorded in Volume 1278 at Page 942 of said land records.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Administrative
Services. The land shall remain under the care and control of said
department until a conveyance is made in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver
any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section,
which deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the
purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The Commissioner of
Administrative Services shall have the sole responsibility for all other
incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-28 2 of 2